Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2626YC (1) 91 sc/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 1B.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 1B.3 Flags on public buildings. 3 1. It shall be the duty of any A board of public officers 4 charged with providing supplies for a public building in the 5 state to shall provide a suitable state flag , and it shall be 6 the duty of the custodian of that public building to shall 7 raise the flags of the United States of America and the state 8 of Iowa , upon each secular day when weather conditions are 9 favorable. 10 2. The custodian of a public building is authorized to raise 11 the national league of families POW/MIA flag upon each secular 12 day when weather conditions are favorable. If a custodian of a 13 public building raises the national league of families POW/MIA 14 flag, the flag shall be flown second in order of precedence 15 directly underneath, or adjacent to, the flag of the United 16 States of America. 17 3. To honor Iowa veterans who are missing in action or 18 prisoners of war, the national league of families POW/MIA flag 19 shall be flown at all state-owned buildings in accordance with 20 federal rules. 21